Delaware, session 153, SB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Â§ 6105, Title 10 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6105. Complaint; parties. (a) A complaint filed under this chapter shall must contain a caption as provided in Rule 10(a) of the Rules of Civil Procedure for the Superior Court, except that but the plaintiff shall name as defendants the property, designated generally by kind, quantity, and location, and at least one 1 of the owners of some part of or interest in the property. (b) The complaint shall must contain a short and plain statement of the authority all of the following: (1) The authority for the taking, the taking. (2) The use for which the property is to be taken consistent with Â§â9501A of Title 29, the Title 29. (3) The plaintiffâs compliance with Â§â9505(15) of Title 29, a Title 29. (4) If the plaintiff is a municipality, the plaintiffâs compliance with Â§120 of Title 22. (5) A description of the property sufficient for its identification, the identification. (6) The interest to be acquired, and, as acquired. (7) As to each separate piece of property, a designation of the defendants who have been joined as owners thereof of the property or of some interest therein. in the property. Section 2. Amend Chapter 1, Title 22 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 120. Real property acquisition and eminent domain. (a) For purposes of this section: (1) âLandâ means real property that a municipality plans to acquire by eminent domain. (2) âOwnerâ means a person who owns land. (3) âPublic useâ means as defined in Â§ 9501A of Title 29. But âpublic useâ does not include recreational purposes. (4) âRecreational purposeâ means as defined in Â§ 5902 of Title 7. (b)(1) Whenever a municipality uses eminent domain to acquire real property, the municipality shall comply with Chapter 95 of Title 29 and this section. (2) A municipality may not use eminent domain to acquire real property for recreational purposes. (c)(1) Before a municipality uses eminent domain to acquire real property, the municipality shall hold a public hearing on the municipalityâs planned use of eminent domain. At least 10 days before the date of the public hearing, the municipality shall give notice of the public hearing as follows: a. By publishing an advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality or in the county in which the municipality is located. b. If the owner can be identified, by mailing written notice by certified mail to the owner. (2) The notice required by paragraph (c)(1) of this section must include all of the following information: a. A description of the land. b. The public use for the land. c. The time and place for the public hearing. (3) At the public hearing, a municipality shall explain all of the following: a. The public use for the land. b. The reason for choosing the land for the public use. c. The right of each owner to receive just compensation under Chapter 95 of Title 29. d. The right of each owner to negotiate, including the right to accept or reject the offer of just compensation required by Chapter 95 of Title 29. (4) The municipality shall allow public comment at the public hearing and the municipality shall consider any objection raised at the public hearing. Section 3. Amend Â§ 9501A, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 9501A. Acquisition by eminent domain. (f) Whenever a municipality exercises eminent domain, the municipality shall comply with Â§ 120 of Title 22. Section 4. This Act applies to condemnation proceedings filed after the Actâs enactment into law.